Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB690.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 41GROUP MARKET PROVISIONSSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. ProceduresC. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.4101. Definitions.§ 4101. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Insurer." An entity licensed by the department with accident and health authority to issue a policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services, and is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).SUBCHAPTER BPROCEDURESSec.4111. Furnishing claims experience data to policyholders.§ 4111. Furnishing claims experience data to policyholders.(a) Requirement.--Subject to the other provisions of this chapter, each insurer shall furnish claims experience data to group policyholders within 30 days of a group policyholder's request unless the information has been furnished to the group policyholder within the preceding six months.(b) Applicable group size.--Claims experience data shall be furnished for each group of 51 or more covered employees, 20250HB0690PN0706 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 members or enrollees, not including dependents.(c) Claims experience data defined.--For purposes of this chapter, claims experience data includes, for at least the last two policy years, if applicable, separated by policy year, the aggregated dollar value of each of the following:(1) Earned premiums.(2) Total incurred claims, including paid, reserved and incurred but not reserved claims, inclusive of high amount claims, pooled claims, capitated expenses and noncapitated expenses.(3) Any amounts incurred in excess of the individual pooling or stop-loss point applicable to the group.(4) Any amounts under a provider reimbursement methodology other than fee for service that were allocated to the group or otherwise accounted for in rating the group's policy.(d) Fee permitted.--An insurer may charge a fee for providing the claims experience data to a group policyholder. The fee must be:(1) Reasonable.(2) Not unfairly discriminatory.(3) In accord with a schedule or methodology filed with the department at least 30 days prior to use, which schedule shall become effective unless disapproved by the department prior to use.(e) Privacy protection.--In providing claims experience data to a group policyholder under this chapter, an insurer shall adhere to all Federal and State laws regarding disclosure of protected health or personal information.SUBCHAPTER C20250HB0690PN0706 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.4121. Regulations.4122. Enforcement and penalties.§ 4121. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary and appropriate to implement, administer and enforce this chapter.§ 4122. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Penalties.--Subject to the other provisions of this section, upon satisfactory evidence of the violation of any section of this chapter by an insurer or any other person, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the license of the offending insurer or other person.(2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending insurer or other person.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this chapter.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this chapter.(b) Limitations.--(1) Fines imposed under this section against an insurer may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(2) Fines imposed under this section against any other person may not exceed $100,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to other remedies or 20250HB0690PN0706 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties that may be imposed under other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. Violations of this chapter shall be deemed to be unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) Administrative procedure.--(1) The administrative provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies).(2) A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0690PN0706 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920